Missouri, session 2026, HB2403.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 161, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 161.028, to read as follows:
161.028. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Rue Wells
Act".
2. For purposes of this section, "activities association" shall mean any nonprofit
statewide organization that facilitates interscholastic activities for secondary school
students and whose members include at least one public school district that pays any
fees to such association including, but not limited to, activity participation fees,
tournament registration fees, membership fees, or any other fees relating to
membership in such association or participation in any activities facilitated by such
association.
3. An activities association shall not serve as the appellate body responsible for
handling appeals relating to any decisions or rulings made by such activities association.
4. (1) There is hereby created the "Transfer Board", which shall serve as the
appellate body responsible for handling appeals relating to any decisions or rulings
made by an activities association.
(2) The transfer board shall be composed of the following:
(a) Three members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(b) Three members appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2403 2
(c) One member appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the
senate.
5. A student who desires to appeal a decision or ruling made by an activities
association that affects such student shall file an appeal with the transfer board within
thirty business days after such decision or ruling made by an activities association.
6. Within five business days of receiving an appeal relating to a decision or
ruling made by an activities association, the transfer board shall convene a meeting to
consider the appeal. Within twenty-four hours of such meeting, the transfer board shall
rule on the appeal, and such ruling shall be final.
✔